Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1254.10
Boating during court-ordered prohibition;
violation; penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to be in the actual
physical control of a motorboat or personal watercraft under propulsion upon
the waters of this state during a period of court-ordered prohibition resulting
from a conviction based upon a violation of section 37-1254.01 or 37-1254.02
or a city or village ordinance enacted in conformance with either section.

(2) Any person
who has been convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of a Class
I misdemeanor.

Laws 2011, LB667, § 17.